District of Columbia statutes.
38-1853.05

Applications.

(a)

In general. —

In order to receive a grant under § 38-1853.04(a), an eligible entity shall submit an application to the Secretary at such time, in such manner, and accompanied by such information as the Secretary may require.

(b)

Contents. —

The Secretary may not approve the request of an eligible entity for a grant under § 38-1853.04(a) unless the entity’s application includes—

(1)

a detailed description of—

(A)

how the entity will address the priorities described in § 38-1853.06;

(B)

how the entity will ensure that if more eligible students seek admission in the program of the entity than the program can accommodate, eligible students are selected for admission through a random selection process which gives weight to the priorities described in § 38-1853.06;

(C)

how the entity will ensure that if more participating eligible students seek admission to a participating school than the school can accommodate, participating eligible students are selected for admission through a random selection process;

(D)

how the entity will notify parents of eligible students of the expanded choice opportunities in order to allow the parents to make informed decisions;

(E)

the activities that the entity will carry out to provide parents of eligible students with expanded choice opportunities through the awarding of scholarships under § 38-1853.07(a);

(F)

how the entity will determine the amount that will be provided to parents under § 38-1853.07(a)(2) for the payment of tuition, fees, and transportation expenses, if any;

(G)

how the entity will seek out private elementary schools and secondary schools in the District of Columbia to participate in the program;

(H)

how the entity will ensure that each participating school will meet the reporting and other program requirements under this chapter;

(I)

how the entity will ensure that participating schools submit to site visits by the entity as determined to be necessary by the entity, except that a participating school may not be required to submit to more than 1 site visit per school year;

(J)

how the entity will ensure that participating schools are financially responsible and will use the funds received under § 38-1853.07 effectively;

(K)

how the entity will address the renewal of scholarships to participating eligible students, including continued eligibility; and

(L)

how the entity will ensure that a majority of its voting board members or governing organization are residents of the District of Columbia; and

(2)

an assurance that the entity will comply with all requests regarding any evaluation carried out under § 38-1853.09(a).

Apr. 15, 2011, 125 Stat. 201, Pub. L. 112-10, Div. C, § 3005
This section is referenced in § 38-1853.04 and § 38-1853.07.